Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.120

Employee teamwork incentive program—Awards.

The agency head may recommend an award amount to the board. Cash awards for suggestion teams shall be up to 25 percent of the actual net savings and/or revenue generated to be shared by the team in a manner approved by the agency head, not to exceed $10,000 per team member. The board shall make the final determination as to whether an award will be made in accordance with applicable rules governing the teamwork incentive program. Awards will be based on the payment award scale. Funds for the teamwork incentive award shall be drawn from the agencies in which the unit is located or from the benefiting fund or account without appropriation when additional revenue is generated to the fund or account.

Awards may be paid to teams for process changes which generate new or additional money for the general fund or any other funds of the state. The director of the office of financial management shall distribute moneys appropriated for this purpose with the concurrence of the productivity board. Transfers shall be made from other funds of the state to the general fund in amounts equal to award payments made by the general fund, for innovations generating new or additional money for those other funds.

[ 2023 c 106 s 5; 1999 c 50 s 9; 1993 c 467 s 6; 1989 c 56 s 4; 1987 c 387 s 7; 1985 c 114 s 6; 1982 c 167 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.

Effective date—1989 c 56: See note following RCW 41.60.041.

Effective date—1985 c 114: See note following RCW 41.60.015.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.